Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.060

State university permanent fund.

There shall be in the state treasury a permanent fund known as the "state university permanent fund," into which shall be paid all moneys derived from the sale of lands granted, held, or devoted to state university purposes.

[ 2007 c 215 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.060. Prior: 1907 c 168 s 1; RRS s 5518.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Contingent effective date—2007 c 215: See notes following RCW 39.42.070.